Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 45.
APPORTIONMENT (CONST., ART. 8, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 8, as amended by Const. Amend. 23, and is incorporated in that article. The amendment was proposed by initiative petition filed in the office of the Secretary of State on July 5, 1956. It was adopted at the general election on Nov. 6, 1956, by a vote of 197,602 for and 143,100 against.

The amendment to Ark. Const., Art. 8, § 3, was held unconstitutional in Yancey v. Faubus, 238 F. Supp. 290 (E.D. Ark. 1965). However, it was held in Faubus v. Kinney, 239 Ark. 443, 389 S.W.2d 887 (1965), that the remainder of the amendment was not affected. See notes to Ark. Const., Art. 8.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 45, § 2, provided, in part: “… this Amendment shall take effect and be in operation immediately upon its approval and adoption by the people of the State of Arkansas, being self-executing and requiring no enabling act.”